Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 4

Return

26-1-401. When executions returnable.

All executions issuing from the supreme court, court of appeals, circuit, chancery, criminal and special courts shall be returnable within thirty (30) days after the date of their issuance.

All general sessions executions shall be returnable within thirty (30) days after the date of their issuance either to the court that issued them or to the court that has possession of the original judgment.

Code 1858, §§ 3021-3024 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 10; ch. 17, § 4; Acts 1837-1838, ch. 190, § 2); Shan., §§ 4749-4752; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8883-8886; Acts 1955, ch. 270, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-125—26-128; Acts 1985, ch. 131, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 22, 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 32.

Law Reviews.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

26-1-402. Duties of executing officer.

Every sheriff or other officer to whose hands an execution may legally come shall give a receipt therefor, if required, and make sufficient return thereof, together with the money collected, on or before the return day as prescribed in § 26-1-401.

Code 1858, § 3025 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 190, § 1); Shan., § 4753; Code 1932, § 8887; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-129.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 20, 22, 28.

26-1-206. Accelerated execution.